da: Stearinlysholdermateriale: Aluminum; Keramik; Kokosnøddeskal; Beton; Emalje; Glas; Plast; Stål; Stentøj; Tin; Andet
ko: 캔들 용기 재질: 알루미늄; 세라믹; 코코넛 껍데기; 콘크리트; 에나멜; 유리; 플라스틱; 강철; 석기; 틴 케이스; 기타
pl: Materiał pojemnika na świece: Aluminium; Ceramika; Łupina kokosa; Beton; Emalia; Szkło; Tworzywo sztuczne; Stal; Kamionka; Blacha; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Material posode za sveče: Aluminij; Keramika; Kokosova lupina; Beton; Emajl; Steklo; Plastika; Jeklo; Kamenina; Pločevina; Druga
sk-SK: Materiál nádoby na sviečky: Hliník; Keramika; Kokosový orech; Betón; Smalt; Sklo; Plast; Oceľ; Kamenina; Plech; Iné
fi: Kynttilän säilytysmateriaali: Alumiini; Keraaminen; Kookospähkinän kuori; Betoni; Emali; Lasi; Muovi; Teräs; Kivitavarainen; Tina; Muu
pt-BR: Material do recipiente da vela: Alumínio; Cerâmica; Fibra de coco; Concreto; Esmalte; Vidro; Plástico; Aço; Stoneware; Estanho; Outro
hu: Gyertyatartó anyag: Alumínium; Kerámia; Kókuszdió héj; Beton; Zománc; Üveg; Műanyag; Acél; Kőagyag; Bádog; Egyéb
zh-CN: 蜡烛容器材质: 铝; 陶瓷; 椰壳; 混凝土; 搪瓷; 玻璃; 塑料; 钢; 粗陶; 锡; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на контейнера за свещи: Алуминий; Керамика; Кокосова черупка; Бетон; Емайл; Стъкло; Пластмаса; Стомана; Каменина; Олово; Друго
sv: Material för ljusbehållare: Aluminium; Keramisk; Kokosnötsskal; Betong; Emalj; Glas; Plast; Stål; Stengods; Burk; Övrigt
el: Υλικό δοχείου κεριού: Αλουμίνιο; Κεραμικό; Κέλυφος καρύδας; Σκυρόδεμα; Εμαγιέ; Γυαλί; Πλαστικό; Ατσάλι; Stoneware; Λευκοσίδηρος; Άλλο
es: Material para contenedor de velas: Aluminio; Cerámica; Concha de coco; Hormigón; Esmalte; Vidrio; Plástico; Acero; Gres; Lata; Otros
it: Materiale del contenitore della candela: Alluminio; Ceramica; Guscio di noce di cocco; Calcestruzzo; Smalto; Vetro; Plastica; Acciaio; Gres porcellanato; Stagno; Altro
de: Material für Kerzenbehälter: Aluminium; Keramik; Kokosnussschale; Beton; Emaillelack; Glas; Kunststoff; Stahl; Steinzeug; Blechdose; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Žvakės konteinerio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Keramika; Kokoso kevalas; Betonas; Emalis; Stiklas; Plastikas; Plienas; Keramika; Skarda; Kita
nb: Materiale for stearinlysholder: Aluminium; Keramikk; Kokosnøttskall; Betong; Emalje; Glass; Plast; Stål; Steintøy; Tinn; Annet
hr-HR: Materijal posude za svijeće: Aluminij; Keramika; Kokosova školjka; Beton; Emajl; Staklo; Plastika; Čelik; Kameno posuđe; Lim; Ostalo
tr: Mum kabı malzemesi: Alüminyum; Seramik; Hindistan cevizi kabuğu; Beton; Emaye; Cam; Plastik; Çelik; Taş işi; Metal; Diğer
pt-PT: Material do recipiente da vela: Alumínio; Cerâmica; Casca de coco; Betão; Esmalte; Vidro; Plástico; Aço; Grés; Estanho; Outro
cs: Materiál nádobky svíčky: Hliník; Keramika; Kokosová skořápka; Beton; Smalt; Sklo; Plast; Ocel; Kamenina; Plech; Jiné
vi: Chất liệu cốc/ly đựng nến: Nhôm; Gốm; Gáo dừa; Bê tông; Men; Thủy tinh; Nhựa; Thép; Đồ đá; Thiếc; Khác
fr: Matériau du contenant de la bougie: Aluminum; Céramique; Coque de noix de coco; Béton; Vernis; Verre; Plastique; Acier; Grès fin; Étain; Autre
ro-RO: Materialul recipientului pentru lumânări: Aluminiu; Ceramică; Coajă de nucă de cocos; Beton; Email; Sticlă; Plastic; Oțel; Gresie ceramică; Tablă; Altele
zh-TW: 蠟燭容器材質: 鋁; 陶瓷; 椰子殼; 混凝土; 琺瑯; 玻璃; 塑膠; 鋼; 炻器; 錫; 其他
ja: キャンドル容器の素材: アルミニウム; セラミック; ココナッツシェル; コンクリート; エナメル; ガラス; プラスチック; スチール; ストーンウェア; 缶; その他
en: Candle container material: Aluminum; Ceramic; Coconut shell; Concrete; Enamel; Glass; Plastic; Steel; Stoneware; Tin; Other
th: วัสดุของภาชนะใส่เทียน: อะลูมิเนียม; เซรามิก; กะลามะพร้าว; คอนกรีต; เครื่องเคลือบ; แก้ว; พลาสติก; เหล็ก; สโตนแวร์; ดีบุก; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал емкости для свечей: Алюминий; Керамика; Кокосовая скорлупа; Бетон; Эмаль; Стекло; Пластик; Сталь; Каменная керамика; Жесть; Другой
nl: Materiaal kaarsenhouder: Aluminium; Keramiek; Kokosnootschaal; Beton; Email; Glas; Plastic; Staal; Steengoed; Tin; Overig